Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB753.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of changing the length of a term for members of the
Kentucky House of Representatives from two years to four years beginning with
members to be elected from even-numbered districts at the general election held in
November 2026, and from odd-numbered districts at the general election held in
November 2028, by amending Sections 30 and 31 of the Constitution of Kentucky as
proposed in Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this Act?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 30 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
Members of the House of Representatives and Senators shall be elected at the
general election in even-numbered years for terms of four years for Senators and
four[two] years for members of the House of Representatives. The term of office of
Representatives and Senators shall begin upon the first day of January of the year
succeeding their election.
Section 3. It is proposed that Section 31 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
At the general election to be held in November, 1984, and every two years
thereafter, there shall be elected for four years one Senator in each Senatorial District in
which the term of his or her predecessor in office will then expire. At the general
election to be held in November, 2026, and every four years thereafter, there shall be
elected[ and] in every even-numbered Representative District one Representative for
four[two] years.
At the general election to be held in November, 2028, and every four years
thereafter, there shall be elected in every odd-numbered Representative District one
Representative for four years.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/22/2025 11:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1111
Section 4. It is further proposed as part of this amendment, and as a schedule of
transitional provisions, that for the purpose of this amendment, and other provisions of
the Constitution of Kentucky notwithstanding, elections held for the office of
Representative in odd-numbered Representative districts in November 2026 shall be for a
two-year term of office.
Section 5. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 6 and 7
of this Act.
Section 6. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general
circulation published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time
and in the same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for
their acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 7. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/22/2025 11:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1111
contained in Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the
county clerk shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified,
indicated on the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to
the voting machines in use in each county or precinct.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/22/2025 11:43 AM Jacketed